Massachusetts, session 194th, H4976.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after Section 22G the following section:-
Section 22G 1/2. No operator of a motor vehicle shall litter, or knowingly permit an
occupant of their vehicle to litter on public or private property through the disposal of trash or
garbage from said motor vehicle. A violation of this section shall be considered a civil motor
vehicle infraction and shall be punishable by a civil citation issued pursuant to chapter 90C,
which shall include a fine of $100 for a first offense, $250 for a second offense, and $500 for a
third or subsequent offense. A civil citation issued for a third or subsequent offense shall be
considered a surchargeable offense under Section 113B of Chapter 175.
SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1